Arkansas, session 2025, HB1100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Arkansas State Claims Commission for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
*CJW002*
01/06/2025 1:53:21 PM CJW002

HB1100
(1) N154N CLAIMS COMMISSION DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS13
(2) G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS11
(3) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(4) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 2 GRADE GS03
(5) U051U CLAIMS COMMISSIONER 5 GRADE GS02
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 10

SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Arkansas State Claims Commission, to be payable from the State Central
Services Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the Arkansas
State Claims Commission for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $477,967
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 188,989
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 95,390
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $762,346

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - CLAIMS. There is hereby appropriated, to
the Arkansas State Claims Commission, to be payable from the Miscellaneous
Revolving Fund, for payment of claims awarded to surviving spouses and/or
dependent children of deceased policemen, firemen, correctional officers and
other specified state employees killed in the official line of duty, as
prescribed by law; for payment of small controversial claim awards made by
the Arkansas State Claims Commission; and for payment of awards made by the
Arkansas State Claims Commission, as provided by law, on non-controversial
claims, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
01/06/2025 1:53:21 PM CJW002

HB1100
NO. 2025-2026
(01) CLAIMS FOR SURVIVING SPOUSES/DEPENDENT
CHILDREN, SMALL CONTROVERSIAL CLAIMS
AND SMALL NON-CONTROVERSIAL CLAIMS $2,250,000

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - FIREFIGHTER BENEFIT REVIEW PANEL. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas State Claims Commission, to be payable
from the State Central Services Fund, for expense reimbursements for the
Firefighter Benefit Review Panel for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the sum of............................................................$8,000.

SECTION 5. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 6. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 7. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
01/06/2025 1:53:21 PM CJW002

HB1100
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.































01/06/2025 1:53:21 PM CJW002